Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB758.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Mechanical Insulation Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission." The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission."Electric distribution company." As defined in 66 Pa.C.S. § 2803 (relating to definitions)."Mechanical insulation." Insulation materials, facings and accessory products used for thermal requirements for mechanical piping and equipment, hot and cold applications and heating, 1234567891011121314151617 venting and air conditioning applications."Total resource cost test." As defined in 66 Pa.C.S. § 2806.1(m) (relating to energy efficiency and conservation program).Section 3. Energy efficiency and conservation plans with inclusion of mechanical insulation.The commission may not disapprove an energy efficiency and conservation plan filed by an electric distribution company under 66 Pa.C.S. § 2806.1(b) (relating to energy efficiency and conservation program) solely due to the inclusion of mechanical insulation which is demonstrated to be cost effective using a total resource cost test approved by the commission.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0758PN0811 - 2 - 1234567891011121314